Maryland, session 2026, HB0319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 197 of the Acts of 2021
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2021. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2026,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.]
Chapter 198 of the Acts of 2021
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2021. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2026,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
– 1 –

Ch. 683 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The State Department of Education, in consultation with county boards of
education and the Motor Vehicle Administration, shall review the regulations adopted
under § 7–801(c) of the Education Article, as enacted by Chapters 197 and 198 of the Acts
of the General Assembly of 2021, authorizing vehicles other than Type I and Type II school
vehicles to transport public school students.
(b) In reviewing the regulations, the Department shall examine:
(1) the requirements for vehicles other than Type I and Type II school
vehicles, including whether they arbitrarily distinguish between different operators of a
vehicle, different types of vehicles, and the number of passengers transported;
(2) the requirements for the drivers of vehicles other than Type I and Type
II school vehicles, including whether they adequately ensure drivers are prepared for
transporting public school students; and
(3) the regulations adopted by the Public Service Commission for
transportation network operators and whether the regulations adopted by the Department
can be brought into alignment with those regulations without sacrificing student safety.
(c) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Department of Education shall report
on the results of its review to the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment
Committee and the House Ways and Means Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –